Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 3
HIGHWAY RELOCATION ASSISTANCE ACT

43-1-301 to 43-1-311. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part repealed, p. 1084, § 14, effective March 31.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was numbered as article 3 of chapter 120, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 3 prior to its repeal in 1989, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the relocation assistance and land acquisition policies, see article 56 of title 24.